Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.250

Certified copies of records—Fee.

The director shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty upon request and payment of the fee as provided herein to furnish under seal of the director certified copies of any records of the department, except those for confidential use only. The director shall charge and collect therefor the actual cost to the department. Any funds accruing to the director of licensing under this section shall be certified and sent to the state treasurer and by him or her deposited to the credit of the highway safety fund.

[ 2010 c 8 s 9001; 1979 c 158 s 125; 1967 c 32 s 3; 1961 c 12 s 46.08.110. Prior: 1937 c 188 s 80; RRS s 6312-80. Formerly RCW 46.08.110.]